Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2889.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 291.1, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 291.1. A. Members of the Legislature shall be allowed
a per diem in lieu of expenses in an amount authorized by the
provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, for
deductibility of expenses for travel while away from home without
additional documentation for each night spent away from home in the
performance of their official duties within the state during regular

Req. No. 10150 Page 1

and extraordinary legislative sessions, not to exceed the number of
legislative days per week.
B. State officers listed in Section 250.4 of this title shall
be allowed a per diem in lieu of expenses in an amount authorized by
the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, for
deductibility of expenses for travel while away from home without
additional documentation for each night spent away from home in the
performance of their official duties, and subject to the
requirements of the State Travel Reimbursement Act. Per diem is
prohibited if the state officer is provided a home that is owned or
leased by the state. State officers are not allowed to receive per
diem when performing nonofficial duties including, but not limited
to, campaigning or conducting campaign-related activities.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 291.1b, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 291.1b. A. Members of the Legislature shall receive
mileage reimbursement pursuant to Section 500.4 of Title 74 of the
Oklahoma Statutes for the number of miles necessarily and
conveniently traveled by the most usual and feasible route to be
present upon convening of the regular or extraordinary sessions of
the Legislature by such member in each and every trip in going to
and returning from the place of meeting of the Legislature. Each
member shall be entitled to mileage reimbursement for one (1) round
trip per week in traveling to and from the meeting of the
Req. No. 10150 Page 2

Legi slature. A member not claiming per diem reimbursement may elect
to receive mileage for not to exceed as many trips as there are
legislative days for a week during each week the Legislature is
actually in regular or extraordinary session, provided that no
single, round-trip mileage reimbursement may exceed the per diem
allowance. Members of the Legislature shall receive mileage
reimbursement, for the use of privately owned vehicles pursuant to
Section 500.4 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes for the number of
miles necessarily and conveniently traveled by the most usual and
feasible route to be present in attending meetings of committees of
which they are members or to which they are invited by Committee
Chairmen when the Legislature is not in session, subject to the
approval of the presiding officer of each house for the members of
the respective houses.
B. State officers listed in Section 250.4 of this title shall
receive mileage reimbursement pursuant to Section 500.4 of this
title for the number of miles necessarily and conveniently traveled
by the most usual and feasible route to be present to perform
official duties. Reimbursement for mileage is prohibited if the
state officer is provided a state-owned or -leased motor vehicle, or
if the state officer has a personal driver employed by or contracted
with the state. State officers are not allowed to receive mileage
reimbursement for nonofficial activities including, but not limited
to, campaigning or conducting campaign related activities.
Req. No. 10150 Page 3

SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-10150 JBH 01/15/25





















Req. No. 10150 Page 4